Nebraska, session 109, LB1238.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1238 LB1238
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2602, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2602 (1) Every stamping agent engaged in distributing or selling
cigarettes at wholesale in this state shall pay to the Tax Commissioner
of this state a special privilege tax. This shall be in addition to all
other taxes. It shall be paid prior to or at the time of the sale, gift,
or delivery to the retail dealer in the several amounts as follows: On
each package of cigarettes containing not more than twenty cigarettes,
thirty percent of the purchase price paid by the retail dealer sixty-four
cents per package; and on packages containing more than twenty
cigarettes, the same tax as provided on packages containing not more than
twenty cigarettes for the first twenty cigarettes in each package and a
tax of one-twentieth of the tax on the first twenty cigarettes on each
cigarette in excess of twenty cigarettes in each package.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2026 October 1, 2004, the State Treasurer
shall place the equivalent of fifty percent forty-nine cents of such tax
in the General Fund. For purposes of this section, the equivalent of a
specified number of cents of the tax shall mean that portion of the
proceeds of the tax equal to the specified number divided by the tax rate
per package of cigarettes containing not more than twenty cigarettes.
(3) The State Treasurer shall distribute the remaining proceeds of
such tax as follows:
(a) Beginning July 1, 2026 1980, the State Treasurer shall place the
equivalent of two percent one cent of such tax in the Nebraska Outdoor
Recreation Development Cash Fund. For fiscal year distributions occurring
after FY1998-99, the distribution under this subdivision shall not be
less than the amount distributed under this subdivision for FY1997-98.
Any money needed to increase the amount distributed under this
subdivision to the FY1997-98 amount shall reduce the distribution to the
General Fund;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2026 1993, the State Treasurer shall place the
-2-

LB1238 LB1238
2026 2026
equivalent of ten percent three cents of such tax in the Health and Human
Services Cash Fund to carry out sections 81-637 to 81-640. For fiscal
year distributions occurring after FY1998-99, the distribution under this
subdivision shall not be less than the amount distributed under this
subdivision for FY1997-98. Any money needed to increase the amount
distributed under this subdivision to the FY1997-98 amount shall reduce
the distribution to the General Fund;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2026 October 1, 2002, and continuing until all
the purposes of the Deferred Building Renewal Act have been fulfilled,
the State Treasurer shall place the equivalent of twenty-six percent
seven cents of such tax in the Building Renewal Allocation Fund. The
distribution under this subdivision shall not be less than the amount
distributed under this subdivision for FY1997-98. Any money needed to
increase the amount distributed under this subdivision to the FY1997-98
amount shall reduce the distribution to the General Fund;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2026 2016, and every fiscal year thereafter,
the State Treasurer shall place the equivalent of five percent three
million eight hundred twenty thousand dollars of such tax in the Nebraska
Public Safety Communication System Cash Fund. If necessary, the State
Treasurer shall reduce the distribution of tax proceeds to the General
Fund pursuant to subsection (2) of this section by such amount required
to fulfill the distribution pursuant to this subdivision; and
(e) Beginning July 1, 2026 2016, and every fiscal year thereafter,
the State Treasurer shall place the equivalent of six percent one million
two hundred fifty thousand dollars of such tax in the Nebraska Health
Care Cash Fund. If necessary, the State Treasurer shall reduce the
distribution of tax proceeds to the General Fund pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section by such amount required to fulfill the distribution
pursuant to this subdivision; and .
(f) Beginning July 1, 2026, and every fiscal year thereafter, the
State Treasurer shall place the equivalent of one percent of such tax in
-3-

LB1238 LB1238
2026 2026
the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund. If necessary, the State Treasurer
shall reduce the distribution of tax proceeds to the General Fund
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section by such amount required to
fulfill the distribution pursuant to this subdivision.
(4) If, after distributing the proceeds of such tax pursuant to
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, any proceeds of such tax remain,
the State Treasurer shall place such remainder in the Nebraska Capital
Construction Fund.
(5) The Legislature hereby finds and determines that the projects
funded from the Building Renewal Allocation Fund are of critical
importance to the State of Nebraska. It is the intent of the Legislature
that the allocations and appropriations made by the Legislature to such
fund not be reduced until all contracts and securities relating to the
construction and financing of the projects or portions of the projects
funded from such fund are completed or paid, and that until such time any
reductions in the cigarette tax rate made by the Legislature shall be
simultaneously accompanied by equivalent reductions in the amount
dedicated to the General Fund from cigarette tax revenue. Any provision
made by the Legislature for distribution of the proceeds of the cigarette
tax for projects or programs other than those to (a) the General Fund,
(b) the Nebraska Outdoor Recreation Development Cash Fund, (c) the Health
and Human Services Cash Fund, (d) the Building Renewal Allocation Fund,
(e) the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Cash Fund, and (f)
the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund shall not be made a higher priority
than or an equal priority to any of the programs or projects specified in
subdivisions (a) through (f) of this subsection.
Sec. 2. Section 77-4008, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-4008 (1)(a) A tax is hereby imposed upon the first owner of
tobacco products to be sold in this state.
(b) The tax on snuff shall be thirty percent of the purchase price
-4-

LB1238 LB1238
2026 2026
paid by the first owner forty-four cents per ounce and a proportionate
tax at the like rate on all fractional parts of an ounce. Such tax shall
be computed based on the net weight as listed by the manufacturer.
(c) The tax on an electronic nicotine delivery system containing
three milliliters or less of consumable material shall be five cents per
milliliter of consumable material and a proportionate tax at the like
rate on all fractional parts of a milliliter.
(c) (d) The tax on an electronic nicotine delivery system containing
more than three milliliters of consumable material shall be thirty ten
percent of (i) the purchase price of such electronic nicotine delivery
system paid by the first owner or (ii) the price at which the first owner
who made, manufactured, or fabricated the electronic nicotine delivery
system sells the item to others.
(d) (e) For electronic nicotine delivery systems in the possession
of retail dealers for which tax has not been paid, the tax under this
subsection shall be imposed at the earliest time the retail dealer: (i)
Brings or causes to be brought into the state any electronic nicotine
delivery system for sale; (ii) makes, manufactures, or fabricates any
electronic nicotine delivery system in this state for sale in this state;
or (iii) sells any electronic nicotine delivery system to consumers
within this state.
(e) (f) The tax on alternative nicotine products shall be thirty
twenty percent of (i) the purchase price of such products paid by the
first owner or (ii) the price at which a first owner who made,
manufactured, or fabricated the product sells the items to others.
(f) (g) The tax on tobacco products not otherwise provided for in
this section shall be thirty twenty percent of (i) the purchase price of
such tobacco products paid by the first owner or (ii) the price at which
a first owner who made, manufactured, or fabricated the tobacco product
sells the items to others.
(g) (h) The tax on tobacco products shall be in addition to all
-5-

LB1238 LB1238
2026 2026
other taxes.
(2) Whenever any person who is licensed under section 77-4009
purchases tobacco products from another person licensed under section
77-4009, the seller shall be liable for the payment of the tax.
(3) Amounts collected pursuant to this section shall be used and
distributed pursuant to section 77-4025.
Sec. 3. Section 81-638, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-638 (1) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the
Legislature shall appropriate for each year from the Health and Human
Services Cash Fund to the department an amount derived from three and
one-half percent one cent of the cigarette tax imposed by section
77-2602, less any amount appropriated from the fund specifically to the
University of Nebraska Eppley Institute for Research in Cancer and Allied
Diseases. The department shall, after deducting expenses incurred in the
administration of such funds, distribute such funds exclusively for
grants and contracts for research on of cancer and smoking diseases, for
funding the cancer registry prescribed in sections 81-642 to 81-649.02,
and for associated expenses due to the establishment and maintenance of
such cancer registry. Not more than two hundred thousand dollars shall be
appropriated for funding the cancer registry and associated expenses. The
University of Nebraska may receive such grants and contracts, and other
postsecondary institutions having colleges of medicine located in the
State of Nebraska may receive such contracts.
(2) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the Legislature shall
appropriate for each year from the Health and Human Services Cash Fund to
the department for cancer research an amount derived from six and one-
half percent two cents of the cigarette tax imposed by section 77-2602 to
be used exclusively for grants and contracts for research on cancer and
smoking diseases. No amount shall be appropriated or used pursuant to
this subsection for the operation and associated expenses of the cancer
-6-

LB1238 LB1238
2026 2026
registry. Not more than one-half of the funds appropriated pursuant to
this subsection shall be distributed to the University of Nebraska
Medical Center for research in cancer and allied diseases and the
University of Nebraska Eppley Institute for Research in Cancer and Allied
Diseases. The remaining funds available pursuant to this subsection shall
be distributed for contracts with other postsecondary educational
institutions having colleges of medicine located in Nebraska which have
cancer research programs for the purpose of conducting research in cancer
and allied diseases.
(3) Any contract between the department and another postsecondary
educational institution for cancer research under subsection (2) of this
section shall provide that:
(a) Any money appropriated for such contract shall only be used for
cancer research and shall not be used to support any other program in the
institution; and
(b) No money appropriated for such contract shall be spent for
travel, building construction, or any other purpose not directly related
to the research that is the subject of the contract.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven million dollars from
the Health and Human Services Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before
June 30, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services. It is the intent of the Legislature that the
transfer to the General Fund in this subsection be from funds credited to
the Cancer Research subfund of the Health and Human Services Cash Fund
which were in excess of appropriations established in subsections (1) and
(2) of this section.
Sec. 4. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. Original section 77-2602, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and sections 77-4008 and 81-638, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-7-

LB1238 LB1238
2026 2026
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-8-